en: Prepared snails
fr: Escargots préparés

en: Cooked snails in parsley butter
fr: Escargot en sauce au beurre persillé cuit
hr: Kuhani puževi na peršinovom maslacu
lt: Sraigės virtame petražolių svieste

en: Frozen cooked snails in parsley butter
fr: Escargots en sauce au beurre persillé cuits surgelés

en: Frozen snails in parsley butter
fr: Escargots en sauce au beurre persillé surgelés

en: Snails from Burgundy
es: Caracoles de borgoña
fi: burgundilaiset etanat
fr: Escargots de Bourgogne
hr: Puževi od bordo
it: Lumache della Borgogna
lt: Sraigės iš Burgundijos
nl: Slakken uit Bourgondië

en: Canned snails
bg: Охлюви от консерва
de: Dosen-Schnecken, Schnecken in der Dose
es: Caracoles enlatados
fr: Escargots en conserve
hr: Konzervirani puževi
lt: Konservuotos sraigės
nl: Slakken in blik/pot
zh: 罐装蜗牛, 罐装田螺

en: Cooked snails, Cooked snail without added fat
fr: Escargots cuits, Escargots cuits sans matière grasse ajoutée
hr: Kuhani puževi
lt: Virtos sraigės, virtos sraigės be pridėtinių riebalų

en: Frozen snails
fr: Escargots surgelés
hr: Smrznuti puževi
lt: Šaldytos sraigės

en: Insects
bg: Насекоми
de: Insekten
es: Insectos, Bichos
fi: hyönteiset
fr: Insectes
hr: Insekti
ja: 食用昆虫
lt: Vabzdžiai
nl: Insecten
zh: 昆虫

en: Ants
de: Ameisen
fr: Fourmis
hr: Mravi
ja: 食用蟻
lt: Skruzdėlės
nl: Mieren
zh: 蚂蚁

en: Zebra, zebra meat
bg: Зебра, месо от зебра
de: Zebra, Zebra-Fleisch
fr: Zèbre, viande de zèbre
hr: Zebra
ja: シマウマの肉
lt: Zebro mėsa
nl: Zebra, zebravlees
zh: 斑马

en: Ostrich, ostrich meat
bg: Щраус, месо от щраус
fr: Autruche, viande d'autruche
hr: Noj
ja: ダチョウの肉
lt: Stručio mėsa
nl: Struisvogel
zh: 鸵鸟

en: Cooked ostrich meat
fr: Viande d'autruche cuite
hr: Kuhano meso noja
lt: Kepta stručio mėsa

en: Frozen ostrich meat
fr: Viande d'autruche surgelée

en: Frogs, Frog meat
bg: Жаби
de: Frösche
fi: Sammakot, Sammakon liha
fr: Grenouille, viande de grenouille
hr: Žabe
ja: カエルの肉
lt: Varlės
nl: Kikkers
zh: 青蛙, 青蛙肉

en: Frog legs
bg: Жабешки крачета
de: Froschschenkel
fr: Cuisses de Grenouilles
hr: Žablji kraci
lt: Varlių kojos
nl: Kikkerbillen
zh: 青蛙腿, 蛙腿

en: Frozen frog legs
fr: Cuisses de Grenouilles surgelées

en: Belgian fresh meat and offal
fr: Viandes et abats frais belges
hr: Belgijsko svježe meso i iznutrice
lt: Šviežia belgiška mėsa ir jų subproduktai

fr: Viande de Blanc-Bleu Belge
nl: Belgisch Witblauw Vlees

en: Italian fresh meat and offal
lt: Šviežia itališka mėsa ir jų subproduktai